Tennessee statutes. Title 43 Agriculture And Horticulture
Part 1

Commissioner—Duties—General Provisions

43-1-101. Qualifications of commissioner.

The commissioner of agriculture, who is in control of the department of agriculture, shall be a practical farmer, actively identified with the agricultural interests of the state.

Acts 1923, ch. 7, § 30; Shan. Supp., § 373a73; Code 1932, §§ 296, 424; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-102.

Compiler's Notes. For transfer of the division of forestry in the department of environment and conservation and its related functions and the administration of the Tennessee Forestry Act from the department of environment and conservation to the department of agriculture, effective July 1, 1991, see Executive Order No. 41 (February 4, 1991).

Cross-References. Animals and animal husbandry, title 44.

Chief executive officers of administrative departments, § 4-3-111.

Commissioner as head of department of agriculture, § 4-3-202.

Department of agriculture, creation, organization and powers of administrative

Department of environment and conservation, title 4, ch. 3, part 5.

Departments and divisions, title 4, ch. 3, part 2.

Farmers' extension work, § 5-9-104.

Food, drugs and cosmetics, title 53.

Natural areas preservation, title 11, ch. 14.

Powers of department of agriculture, § 4-3-203.

Revocation; denial or suspension of professional, driver and other licenses, to enforce child support obligations, title 36, ch. 5, part 7.

Salaries of Class 1 and Class 2 officers, § 8-23-101.

State forests, title 11, ch. 4.

Tennessee heritage conservation trust fund, title 11, ch. 7.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Agriculture, § 3.

Law Reviews.

Disqualification of Administrative Officials for Bias (Robert N. Covington), 13 Vand. L. Rev. 712.

Comparative Legislation. Department and commissioner of agriculture:

Ala. Code, § 2-2-1 et seq.

Ga. O.C.G.A. § 2-2-1 et seq.

Ky. Rev. Stat. Ann. § 246.010 et seq.

Miss. Code Ann. § 69-1-1 et seq.

Mo. Rev. Stat. § 261.010 et seq.

N.C. Gen. Stat. § 106-1 et seq.

Va. Code § 3.1-8 et seq.

Collateral References. 3 Am. Jur. 2d Agriculture § 19 et seq.

3 C.J.S. Agriculture §§ 2, 6.

Agriculture
2.

43-1-102 — 43-1-105.
[Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §§ 43-1-102 — 43-1-105 (Acts 1883, ch. 173, § 4; 1899, ch. 6, §§ 1, 2; Code 1932, §§ 425, 427-429; Acts 1949, ch. 38, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 425; Shan., §§ 315a1, 315a2, 317; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 43-103 — 43-106), concerning commissioner's salary, fees paid to state treasury, disbursements, and commercial fertilizers, were repealed by Acts 1988, ch. 878, §§ 9-12.

43-1-106. Duties of commissioner.

It is the duty of the commissioner of agriculture to determine, on the commissioner's own initiative, or upon request by the county legislative body of any county in this state, agricultural areas adjacent to state highways that are:

Row crop areas devoted primarily for the growth of corn, cotton, soy beans, vegetables, and other similar seasonal agricultural commodities; and

Grassland areas maintained and used primarily for grazing of livestock.

Acts 1875, ch. 13, § 4; Shan., § 318; Code 1932, § 430; modified; Acts 1961, ch. 22, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1965, ch. 82, § 8; impl. am. Acts 1971, ch. 90, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1971, ch. 131, § 1; Acts 1972, ch. 801, § 2; impl. am. Acts 1973, ch. 341, § 3; 1977, ch. 112, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-107; Acts 1988, ch. 878, § 13.

Compiler's Notes. For transfer of the division of forestry in the department of environment and conservation and its related functions and the administration of the Tennessee Forestry Act from the department of environment and conservation to the department of agriculture, effective July 1, 1991, see Executive Order No. 41 (February 4, 1991).

Cross-References. Aerial application of pesticides, § 43-8-302.

Anhydrous Ammonia Storage and Equipment Law, administering and enforcing, § 43-11-302.

Apiaries, rules and regulations regarding, § 44-15-121.

Baby chicks, powers and duties of commissioner, title 44, ch. 16.

Commercial feed law, administration, § 44-6-102.

Community gardening, powers and duties of commissioner, title 43, ch. 24.

Dairy law, powers and duties of commissioner, § 53-3-104.

Fertilizers and liming materials, administration of provisions, § 43-11-102.

Garbage feeding law, administration, § 44-2-403.

Insecticides, fungicides and rodenticides law, commissioner's powers and duties, §§ 43-8-104, 43-8-106, 43-8-109, 43-8-110, 43-8-112.

Inspector of apiaries, appointment, § 44-15-203.

Liming materials, rules and regulations, § 43-11-410.

Livestock dealers act, duties, title 44, ch. 10, part 2.

Pesticides, commercial aerial application of, powers and duties of commissioner, § 43-8-302.

Plant, animal life or virus, declaring to be pest, § 43-8-106.

Registration of pesticides, § 43-8-104.

Seed law, administration of, title 43, ch. 10, part 1.

Soybean promotion, powers and duties of commissioner, title 43, ch. 20.

Tennessee garbage feeding law, duties, title 44, ch. 2, part 4.

Tobacco regulations, commissioner's duties to promulgate and enforce, § 43-19-301.

Weighmasters, powers and duties of commissioner, title 47, ch. 26, part 10.

Weights and measures, commissioner's powers and duties, title 47, ch. 26, part 9.

Wetlands, title 11, ch. 14, part 4.

43-1-107. Annual planting and harvest seasons.

Except as provided in § 70-8-203, the recognized annual planting and harvest seasons for the state extend from January 1 to December 31 of each year.

Acts 2015, ch. 135, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former §§ 43-1-107 — 43-1-110 (Acts 1875, ch. 13, § 6; 1919, ch. 174, §§ 1, 2; 1921, ch. 176, § 1; Code 1932, §§ 431, 432, 442; Acts 1933, ch. 123, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 442, 442.1; Shan., § 325; Shan. Supp., §§ 318a1, 318a2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 43-108 — 43-111), concerning collection of farm data, compensation of assessor, payment of appropriations, expenditure of funds, were repealed by Acts 1988, ch. 878, §§ 14-17.

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 135, § 2. April 16, 2015.

43-1-108. Audiovisual recordation of animal inspection permitted.

Unless otherwise prohibited by federal law, the owner of any animal that is subject to an inspection in this state for the purpose of determining compliance with any statutory or regulatory requirement shall be permitted to personally record such inspection by audiovisual means or designate an agent to record such inspection by audiovisual means.

Acts 2016, ch. 628, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2016, ch. 628, § 1 enacted this as a new § 43-1-102 but the section has been redesignated as § 43-1-108 by authority of the Code Commission.

Compiler's Notes. Former §§ 43-1-107 — 43-1-110 (Acts 1875, ch. 13, § 6; 1919, ch. 174, §§ 1, 2; 1921, ch. 176, § 1; Code 1932, §§ 431, 432, 442; Acts 1933, ch. 123, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 442, 442.1; Shan., § 325; Shan. Supp., §§ 318a1, 318a2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 43-108 — 43-111), concerning collection of farm data, compensation of assessor, payment of appropriations, expenditure of funds, were repealed by Acts 1988, ch. 878, §§ 14-17.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 628, § 2. March 22, 2016.

43-1-109. Primary inspection agency for grist mills.

The department of agriculture, in its role as the primary food manufacturing inspection agency for this state, shall be the primary inspection agency for grist mills that are located in this state.

Acts 2016, ch. 764, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 764, § 2. April 19, 2016.

43-1-110. [Reserved.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §§ 43-1-107 — 43-1-110 (Acts 1875, ch. 13, § 6; 1919, ch. 174, §§ 1, 2; 1921, ch. 176, § 1; Code 1932, §§ 431, 432, 442; Acts 1933, ch. 123, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 442, 442.1; Shan., § 325; Shan. Supp., §§ 318a1, 318a2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 43-108 — 43-111), concerning collection of farm data, compensation of assessor, payment of appropriations, expenditure of funds, were repealed by Acts 1988, ch. 878, §§ 14-17.

43-1-111. Promotion and enhancement of equine industry.

The commissioner of agriculture shall employ at least one (1) agricultural marketing specialist whose primary duty shall be the provision and coordination of such technical assistance, support, and encouragement as may be needed to promote and enhance development of Tennessee's equine industry. The commissioner shall collect, publish, and distribute statistics relating to equine production and marketing activities and opportunities within the state. The commissioner shall provide such other informational services as may be needed to notify the state's equine industry concerning the financial, managerial, marketing, regulatory, and administrative aspects of the horse industry in Tennessee and in other states.

Acts 1988, ch. 796, § 1.

43-1-112. Nursery stock production, sales and marketing.

The commissioner of agriculture shall employ at least one (1) production and marketing specialist whose primary duty shall be the provision and coordination of technical assistance, support, and encouragement needed to promote and enhance the statewide development of nursery stock production and sales. At least once each year, the commissioner shall collect, publish, and distribute statistics relating to nursery stock production, marketing activities, and opportunities across the state. The commissioner shall provide other information to notify Tennesseans of the financial, managerial, marketing, regulatory, and administrative aspects of nursery stock production.

As used in this section, “nursery stock production” means growing or propagating ornamental trees, shrubs, and other perennial plants or parts of ornamental trees, shrubs, or plants for sale on a commercial basis.

To the extent feasible within existing budgetary resources, the University of Tennessee extension shall assist and cooperate with the department of agriculture in the provision and coordination of technical assistance, statistical, marketing and other information, support and encouragement necessary to promote and enhance the statewide development of nursery stock production.

Acts 1993, ch. 166, §§ 1, 2; 2004, ch. 517, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2004, ch. 517, § 15 provided that the University of Tennessee extension service shall spend no funds beyond those currently budgeted to accelerate the replacement of signs, letterhead, and business cards on account of the provisions of the act.

43-1-113. Definition of agriculture.

The definition of agriculture as set forth in subsection (b) shall be applicable to the term wherever it appears in the code, unless a different definition is specifically made applicable to the part, chapter, or section in which the term appears.

“Agriculture” means:

The land, buildings and machinery used in the commercial production of farm products and nursery stock;

The activity carried on in connection with the commercial production of farm products and nursery stock;

Recreational and educational activities on land used for the commercial production of farm products and nursery stock; and.

Entertainment activities conducted in conjunction with, but secondary to, commercial production of farm products and nursery stock, when such activities occur on land used for the commercial production of farm products and nursery stock.

As used in this definition of agriculture, the term “farm products” means forage and sod crops; grains and feed crops; dairy and dairy products; poultry and poultry products; livestock, including breeding and grazing; fruits; vegetables; flowers; seeds; grasses; forestry products; fish and other aquatic animals used for food; bees; equine; and all other plants and animals that produce food, feed, fiber or fur.

As used in this definition of agriculture, the term “nursery stock” means all trees, shrubs, or other plants, or parts of trees, shrubs or other plants, grown or kept for, or capable of, propagation, distribution or sale on a commercial basis.

Acts 2005, ch. 19, § 2; 2014, ch. 581, § 2.

Amendments. The 2014 amendment added (b)(1)(D).

Effective Dates. Acts 2014, ch. 581, § 5. March 28, 2014.

Cross-References. Definition of terms used in code, § 1-3-105.

Attorney General Opinions. County zoning of buildings used as residences by farmers and farm workers. OAG 14-79, 2014 Tenn. AG LEXIS 82 (9/4/14).

The definition for “agriculture” at T.C.A. §§ 1-3-105(2)(A) and 43-1-113(b)(1) is applicable to the word “agriculture” as used in the definition of “Farm Property” in T.C.A. § 67-5-501(3). OAG 17-30, 2017 Tenn. AG LEXIS 29 (4/17/2017).

The definition of “agriculture” in T.C. A. §§ 1-3-105(a)(2)(A) and 43-1-113(b)(1) applies in determining the meaning of “agricultural” as used in T.C.A. § 5-1-118(b), T.C.A. § 5-1-122, and T.C.A. § 13-7-114. AG LEXIS 35 (7/26/2017).

43-1-114. Definition of livestock — Applicability.

The definition of livestock as set forth in subsection (b) shall be applicable to the term wherever it appears in the code, unless a different definition is specifically made applicable to the part, chapter, or section in which the term appears or unless the context otherwise requires.

“Livestock” means all equine as well as animals that are being raised primarily for use as food or fiber for human utilization or consumption including, but not limited to, cattle, sheep, swine, goats, and poultry.

Acts 2014, ch. 568, § 2.

Effective Dates. Acts 2014, ch. 568, § 6. March 21, 2014.